Utah, session 2026, HB104.
Section 1. Section 63G-1-301 is amended to read:63G-1-301. Legal holidays -- Personal preference day -- Governor authorized to declare additional legal holidays.(1)The following days are legal holidays in Utah:(a)except as provided in Subsection (2)(a) or (b):(i)January 1, New Year's Day;(ii)July 4, Independence Day;(iii)July 24, Pioneer Day;(iv)November 11, Veterans Day;(v)December 25, Christmas; and(vi)a day designated by proclamation issued by the president of the United States or the governor as a day of fasting or thanksgiving;(b)(i)the first Sunday after the first full moon that occurs on or after the spring equinox, Easter Sunday;(ii)the third Monday of January, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;(iii)the third Monday of February, Washington and Lincoln Day;(iv)the last Monday of May, Memorial Day;(v)the first Monday of September, Labor Day;(vi)the second Monday of October, Columbus Day;(vii)the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, Election Day;(vii)(viii)the fourth Thursday of November, Thanksgiving Day; and(viii)(ix)except as provided in Subsection (2)(c) or (d), June 19, Juneteenth National Freedom Day; and(c)except as provided in Subsection (3), every Sunday.(2)(a)If a day described in Subsection (1)(a) falls on a Saturday, the preceding Friday is the legal holiday.(b)If a day described in Subsection (1)(a) falls on a Sunday, the following Monday is the legal holiday.(c)If June 19 falls on a Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, or Friday, the preceding Monday is the legal holiday.(d)If June 19 falls on Saturday or Sunday, the following Monday is the legal holiday.(3)For purposes of Utah Constitution, Article VI, Section 16, Subsection (1), regarding the exclusion of state holidays from the 45-day legislative general session, Sunday is not considered a state holiday.(4)Each employee may select one additional day, called Personal Preference Day, to be scheduled in accordance with rules made, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, by the Division of Human Resource Management, which the employee may use to observe a state holy day, as described in Section 63G-1-1101, or any other day the employee chooses to recognize.(5)(a)If, in the governor's opinion, extraordinary conditions exist justifying the action, the governor may:(i)declare, by proclamation, legal holidays in addition to those legal holidays described in Subsections (1) and (2); or(ii)limit the legal holidays described in Subsection (5)(a)(i) to certain classes of business and activities to be designated by the governor.(b)Except as provided in Subsection (5)(c), a legal holiday described in Subsection (5)(a) may not extend for a longer period than 60 consecutive days.(c)The governor may, by proclamation:(i)renew a legal holiday described in Subsection (5)(a) for one or more periods not exceeding 30 days each as the governor determines necessary; or(ii)terminate a legal holiday described under Subsection (5)(a) or (b) earlier than the time period described in a preceding proclamation.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.